Florida, session 2026, SB524.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 104 105 Section 1.âEffective upon becoming a law, subsection (4) is 106 added to section 112.195, Florida Statutes, to read: 107 112.195âFlorida Medal of Valor and Florida Blue/Red Heart 108 Medal.â 109 (4)âThe Department of Law Enforcement may adopt rules to 110 implement this section. 111 Section 2.âSubsections (2) and (4) of section 406.02, 112 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 113 406.02âMedical Examiners Commission; membership; terms; 114 duties; staff.â 115 (2)âThe term of office of the physicians appointed to the 116 commission shall be 4 years. The term of office of the state 117 attorney, public defender, sheriff, and county commissioner each 118 shall be 4 years unless she or he leaves that office sooner, in 119 which case her or his appointment will terminate. The term of 120 office of the funeral director shall be 4 years. Upon the 121 expiration of the present terms of office, the Governor shall 122 appoint two members for terms of 4 years, two members for terms 123 of 3 years, two members for terms of 2 years, and one member for 124 a term of 1 year. An appointment to fill a vacancy shall be for 125 the unexpired portion of the term. An appointment or 126 reappointment is considered in force until the appointee 127 resigns, the appointee is no longer qualified for the position, 128 or the Governor appoints a new member. 129 (4)âThe Medical Examiners Commission shall: 130 (a)âInitiate cooperative policies with any agency of the 131 state or political subdivision thereof. 132 (b)âApprove the appointment of district medical examiners 133 by a majority vote to fill vacancies. 134 (c)âRemove or suspend district medical examiners pursuant 135 to this act and have the authority to investigate violations of 136 this act. 137 (d)(c)âOversee the distribution of state funds for the 138 medical examiner districts and may make such agreements and 139 contracts, subject to approval of the executive director of the 140 Department of Law Enforcement, as may be necessary to effect the 141 provisions of this chapter. 142 Section 3.âSubsection (1) of section 406.06, Florida 143 Statutes, is amended to read: 144 406.06âDistrict medical examiners; associates; suspension 145 of medical examiners.â 146 (1)(a)âA district medical examiner shall be appointed by 147 The Medical Examiners Commission shall appoint a district 148 medical examiner, who must be a practicing physician in 149 pathology, Governor for each medical examiner district from 150 nominees who are practicing physicians in pathology, whose 151 nominations are submitted to the Governor by the Medical 152 Examiners Commission. The term of office of each district 153 medical examiner shall be 3 years. An appointment to fill a 154 vacancy shall be for the unexpired portion of the term. 155 (b)âA physician member of the Medical Examiners Commission 156 is shall be eligible to serve as a district medical examiner 157 upon approval by the Medical Examiners Commission Governor. 158 Section 4.âParagraph (d) is added to subsection (3) of 159 section 406.135, Florida Statutes, to read: 160 406.135âAutopsies; confidentiality of photographs and video 161 and audio recordings; confidentiality of reports of minor 162 victims of domestic violence; exemption.â 163 (3) 164 (d)âNotwithstanding subsection (2), in order to facilitate 165 an anatomical gift or a transplantation, an eye bank, an organ 166 procurement organization, or a tissue bank as those terms are 167 defined in s. 765.511, pursuant to a written request containing 168 proof of the intent of the deceased, the deceasedâs family, or 169 the deceasedâs health care surrogate to make an anatomical gift 170 in accordance with chapter 765, may: 171 1.âView or copy an autopsy report of a minor whose death 172 was related to an act of domestic violence; and 173 2.âView or copy an autopsy report of a person whose manner 174 of death was determined by a medical examiner to have been by 175 suicide. 176 Section 5.âEffective upon becoming a law, section 624.34, 177 Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 178 624.34âAuthority of Department of Law Enforcement to accept 179 fingerprints of, and exchange criminal history records with 180 respect to, certain persons.â 181 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 182 (a)ââAdjusterâ means a public adjuster as defined in s. 183 626.854 or an all-lines adjuster as defined in s. 626.8548. 184 (b)ââAgentâ means a general lines agent, life agent, health 185 agent, or title agent, as each type of agent is defined under s. 186 626.015. The term includes a producer, but does not include a 187 customer representative, limited customer representative, or 188 service representative. 189 (c)ââApplicant for licensureâ means a person or an entity 190 that has applied to the department for a license as an agent, an 191 insurance agency, an adjuster, a customer representative, a 192 service representative, or a navigator. 193 (d)ââControl person,â with respect to an applicant for 194 licensure, means any of the following: 195 1.âA person who holds the title of owner, partner, 196 director, president, senior vice president, treasurer, or 197 limited liability company member. 198 2.âA person who holds any of the officer, general partner, 199 manager, or managing member positions named in the governing 200 documents. As used in this subparagraph, the term âgoverning 201 documentsâ includes bylaws, articles of incorporation or 202 organization, partnership agreements, shareholder agreements, 203 and management or operating agreements. 204 3.âA director on the board of directors. 205 4.âA shareholder in whose name shares are registered in the 206 records of a corporation for profit, whether incorporated under 207 the laws of this state or organized under the laws of any other 208 jurisdiction and existing in that legal form, who directly or 209 indirectly has the power to vote 10 percent or more of a class 210 of voting securities, or to sell or direct the sale of 10 211 percent or more of a class of voting securities. As used in this 212 subparagraph, the term âshareholderâ means a person who owns at 213 least one share of a corporation and whose ownership is 214 reflected in the records of the corporation. 215 (e)ââCustomer representativeâ has the same meaning as in s. 216 626.015. 217 (f)ââInsurance agencyâ has the same meaning as in s. 218 626.015. 219 (g)ââLicenseâ means a license issued by the Department of 220 Financial Services. 221 (h)ââLicenseeâ means a person or an entity that has a 222 license. 223 (i)ââNavigatorâ has the same meaning as in s. 626.9951. 224 (j)ââProducerâ means a person required to be licensed under 225 the laws of this state to sell, solicit, or negotiate insurance. 226 (k)ââService representativeâ has the same meaning as in s. 227 626.015. 228 (2)âThe Legislature finds that criminal activity of agents, 229 customer representatives, adjusters, service representatives, or 230 navigators poses a particular danger to the residents of this 231 state. Floridians rely, in good faith, on the honest conduct of 232 such persons. To safeguard the residents of this state, the 233 Legislature finds it necessary to ensure that individuals who 234 are licensees or control persons of licensees do not have a 235 criminal record. 236 (3)âThe Department of Law Enforcement shall may accept and 237 process fingerprints taken of a natural person who is a control 238 person of a licensee or an applicant for licensure organizers, 239 incorporators, subscribers, officers, stockholders, directors, 240 or any other persons involved, directly or indirectly, in the 241 organization, operation, or management of: 242 (a)âAny insurer or proposed insurer transacting or 243 proposing to transact insurance in this state. 244 (b)âAny other entity which is examined or investigated or 245 which is eligible to be examined or investigated under the 246 provisions of the Florida Insurance Code. 247 (2)âThe Department of Law Enforcement may accept 248 fingerprints of individuals who apply for a license as an agent, 249 customer representative, adjuster, service representative, or 250 navigator or the fingerprints of the majority owner, sole 251 proprietor, partners, officers, and directors of a corporation 252 or other legal entity that applies for licensure with the 253 department or office under the Florida Insurance Code. 254 (4)âA full set of fingerprints of a natural person 255 described in subsection (3) must be submitted to the Department 256 of Financial Services or to a vendor, an entity, or an agency 257 authorized under s. 943.053(13). The Department of Financial 258 Services, vendor, entity, or agency shall forward the 259 fingerprints to the Department of Law Enforcement for state 260 processing, and the Department of Law Enforcement shall forward 261 the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for 262 national processing pursuant to s. 624.34(5). Fees for state and 263 federal fingerprint processing must be borne by the person 264 submitting them. The state cost for fingerprint processing is as 265 provided in s. 943.053(3)(e). 266 (5)(3)âThe Department of Law Enforcement may, to the extent 267 authorized provided for by federal law, exchange state, 268 multistate, and federal criminal history records with the 269 Department of Financial Services department or office for the 270 purpose of the issuance, denial, suspension, or revocation of a 271 certificate of authority, certification, or license to operate 272 in this state. 273 (6)âThe full set of fingerprints for each natural person 274 described in subsection (3) must be submitted in accordance with 275 rules adopted by the Department of Financial Services. 276 (a)âFingerprints may be submitted through a third-party 277 vendor authorized by the Department of Law Enforcement. 278 (b)âThe Department of Law Enforcement shall conduct a state 279 criminal history background check, and a federal criminal 280 history background check must be conducted through the Federal 281 Bureau of Investigation. 282 (c)âAll fingerprints submitted to the Department of Law 283 Enforcement must be submitted and entered into the statewide 284 automated biometric identification system established in s. 285 943.05(2)(b) and be available for use in accordance with s. 286 943.05(2)(g) and (h). The Department of Financial Services shall 287 inform the Department of Law Enforcement of the name of any 288 person whose fingerprints no longer need to be retained. 289 (d)âThe costs of fingerprint processing, including the cost 290 of retaining the fingerprints, must be borne by the natural 291 person subject to the background check. 292 (e)âThe Department of Financial Services shall review the 293 results of the state and federal criminal history background 294 checks and determine whether the applicant meets the 295 requirements for a license to operate in this state. 296 (4)âThe Department of Law Enforcement may accept 297 fingerprints of any other person required by statute or rule to 298 submit fingerprints to the department or office or any applicant 299 or licensee regulated by the department or office who is 300 required to demonstrate that he or she has not been convicted of 301 or pled guilty or nolo contendere to a felony or a misdemeanor. 302 (5)âThe Department of Law Enforcement shall, upon receipt 303 of fingerprints from the department or office, submit the 304 fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation to check 305 federal criminal history records. 306 (7)(6)âThe Department of Financial Services shall use the 307 statewide criminal records obtained through the Department of 308 Law Enforcement, the federal criminal records obtained through 309 the Federal Bureau of Investigation, and the local criminal 310 records obtained through local law enforcement agencies shall be 311 used by the department and office for the purpose of issuance, 312 denial, suspension, or revocation of certificates of authority, 313 certifications, or licenses issued to operate in this state. 314 Section 6.âEffective upon becoming a law, section 624.341, 315 Florida Statutes, is created to read: 316 624.341âAuthority of Department of Law Enforcement to 317 accept fingerprints of, and exchange criminal history records 318 with respect to, certain persons applying to the Office of 319 Insurance Regulation.â 320 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 321 (a)ââApplicant for licensureâ means a person or an entity 322 that has applied to the office for a license. 323 (b)ââControl person,â with respect to a licensee or 324 applicant for licensure, means any of the following: 325 1.âA person who holds the title of president, treasurer, 326 chief executive officer, chief financial officer, chief 327 operations officer, chief legal officer, chief risk officer, 328 chief underwriting officer, chief actuary, chief compliance 329 officer, claims manager, director of claims, director of 330 underwriting, underwriting manager, or attorney in fact. 331 2.âA person who holds any of the officer, general partner, 332 manager, or managing member positions named in the governing 333 documents. As used in this subparagraph, the term âgoverning 334 documentsâ includes bylaws, articles of incorporation or 335 organization, partnership agreements, shareholder agreements, 336 and management or operating agreements. 337 3.âA director on the board of directors. 338 4.âA shareholder in whose name shares are registered in the 339 records of a corporation for profit, whether incorporated under 340 the laws of this state or organized under the laws of any other 341 jurisdiction and existing in that legal form, who directly or 342 indirectly has the power to vote 10 percent or more of a class 343 of voting securities, or to sell or direct the sale of 10 344 percent or more of a class of voting securities. As used in this 345 subparagraph, the term âshareholderâ means a person who owns at 346 least one share of a corporation and whose ownership is 347 reflected in the records of the corporation. 348 (c)ââLicenseâ means a certificate of authority, 349 certification, registration, or license issued by the office. 350 (d)ââLicenseeâ means a person or an entity that has a 351 license. 352 (2)âThe Legislature finds that criminal activity of 353 insurers poses a particular danger to the residents of this 354 state. Floridians rely, in good faith, on the honest conduct of 355 those who issue and manage insurance policies and other 356 insurance instruments in this state. To safeguard the residents 357 of this state, the Legislature finds it necessary to ensure that 358 natural persons who are licensees or control persons of 359 licensees do not have a criminal record. 360 (3)âThe Department of Law Enforcement shall accept and 361 process fingerprints taken of a natural person who is a control 362 person of a licensee of the office or an applicant for licensure 363 with the office. 364 (4)âA full set of fingerprints of a natural person 365 described in subsection (3) must be submitted to the office or 366 to a vendor, an entity, or an agency authorized under s. 367 943.053(13). The office, vendor, entity, or agency shall forward 368 the fingerprints to the Department of Law Enforcement for state 369 processing, and the Department of Law Enforcement shall forward 370 the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for 371 national processing pursuant to s. 624.34(5). Fees for state and 372 federal fingerprint processing must be borne by the person 373 submitting them. The state cost for fingerprint processing is as 374 provided in s. 943.053(3)(e). 375 (5)âThe Department of Law Enforcement may, to the extent 376 authorized by federal law, exchange state, multistate, and 377 federal criminal history records with the office for the purpose 378 of the issuance, denial, suspension, or revocation of a 379 certificate of authority, certification, registration, or 380 license to operate in this state. 381 (6)âThe full set of fingerprints for each natural person 382 described in subsection (3) must be submitted in accordance with 383 rules adopted by the commission. 384 (a)âFingerprints may be submitted through a third-party 385 vendor authorized by the Department of Law Enforcement. 386 (b)âThe Department of Law Enforcement shall conduct a state 387 criminal history background check, and a federal criminal 388 history background check shall be conducted through the Federal 389 Bureau of Investigation. 390 (c)âAll fingerprints submitted to the Department of Law 391 Enforcement must be submitted and entered into the statewide 392 automated biometric identification system established in s. 393 943.05(2)(b) and be available for use in accordance with s. 394 943.05(2)(g) and (h). The office shall inform the Department of 395 Law Enforcement of the name of any person whose fingerprints no 396 longer need to be retained. 397 (d)âThe costs of fingerprint processing, including the cost 398 of retaining the fingerprints, must be borne by the natural 399 person subject to the background check. 400 (e)âThe office shall review the results of the state and 401 federal criminal history background checks and determine whether 402 the applicant meets the requirements for a certificate of 403 authority, certification, registration, or license to operate in 404 this state. 405 (7)âThe office shall use the statewide criminal records 406 obtained through the Department of Law Enforcement, the federal 407 criminal records obtained through the Federal Bureau of 408 Investigation, and the local criminal records obtained through 409 local law enforcement agencies for the purpose of issuance, 410 denial, suspension, or revocation of certificates of authority, 411 certifications, registrations, or licenses required to operate 412 in this state. 413 Section 7.âSection 943.0417, Florida Statutes, is created 414 to read: 415 943.0417âStatewide law enforcement apprenticeship program. 416 The Florida Deputy Sheriffs Association, Inc., shall continue 417 the statewide law enforcement grant program certified by the 418 Department of Education to recruit, select, train, certify, and 419 retain deputy sheriff candidates who lack the funds to attend a 420 certified law enforcement academy within this state. The grants 421 must be awarded to local law enforcement agencies, with priority 422 given for fiscally constrained counties. The association may 423 coordinate with the department to implement the program. 424 Section 8.âSection 943.0536, Florida Statutes, is created 425 to read: 426 943.0536âImmigration detainer information; collection and 427 storage; fingerprinting.â 428 (1)âAs used in this section, the terms âimmigration 429 detainerâ and âlaw enforcement agencyâ have the same meaning as 430 in s. 908.102. 431 (2)âThe departmentâs Criminal Justice Information Program, 432 acting as this stateâs central criminal justice information 433 repository, shall collect, process, store, maintain, and 434 disseminate immigration detainer information. 435 (3)(a)âEach law enforcement agency shall capture and 436 electronically submit to the department, in the manner 437 prescribed by rule, the fingerprints of a qualifying offender as 438 defined in s. 943.325 who is in its custody and subject to an 439 immigration detainer. 440 (b)âUpon receipt of the fingerprints required to be 441 submitted pursuant to paragraph (a), the department shall create 442 a record containing the qualifying offenderâs immigration 443 detainer information. 444 Section 9.âSection 943.0581, Florida Statutes, is amended 445 to read: 446 943.0581âAdministrative expunction for arrests or 447 immigration detainer records made contrary to law or by 448 mistake.â 449 (1)âNotwithstanding any law dealing generally with the 450 preservation and destruction of public records, the department 451 may adopt a rule pursuant to chapter 120 for the administrative 452 expunction of any nonjudicial record of an arrest or record 453 containing immigration detainer information described in s. 454 943.0536 of a minor or an adult made contrary to law or by 455 mistake. 456 (2)âA law enforcement agency shall apply to the department 457 in the manner prescribed by rule for the administrative 458 expunction of any nonjudicial record of any arrest or record 459 containing immigration detainer information described in s. 460 943.0536 of a minor or an adult who is subsequently determined 461 by the agency, at its discretion, or by the final order of a 462 court of competent jurisdiction, to have been arrested or 463 detained contrary to law or by mistake. 464 (3)âAn adult or, in the case of a minor child, the parent 465 or legal guardian of the minor child, may apply to the 466 department in the manner prescribed by rule for the 467 administrative expunction of any nonjudicial record of an arrest 468 or record containing immigration detainer information described 469 in s. 943.0536 alleged to have been made contrary to law or by 470 mistake, provided that the application is supported by the 471 endorsement of the head of the arresting or detaining agency or 472 his or her designee or the state attorney of the judicial 473 circuit in which the arrest or detainment occurred or his or her 474 designee. 475 (4)âAn application for administrative expunction shall 476 include the date and time of the arrest, the name of the person 477 arrested, the offender-based tracking system (OBTS) number, and 478 the crime or crimes charged. The application shall be on the 479 submitting agencyâs letterhead and shall be signed by the head 480 of the submitting agency or his or her designee. 481 (5)âIf the person was arrested on a warrant, capias, or 482 pickup order, a request for an administrative expunction may be 483 made by the sheriff of the county in which the warrant, capias, 484 or pickup order was issued or his or her designee or by the 485 state attorney of the judicial circuit in which the warrant, 486 capias, or pickup order was issued or his or her designee. 487 (6)âAn application for an administrative expunction of a 488 record containing immigration detainer information as described 489 in s. 943.0536 must include the date and time the person was 490 detained, the personâs name, the OBTS number, and information 491 relating to the immigration detainer. The application must be on 492 the submitting agencyâs letterhead and must be signed by the 493 head of the submitting agency or his or her designee. 494 (7)âAn application or endorsement under this section is not 495 admissible as evidence in any judicial or administrative 496 proceeding and may not be construed in any way as an admission 497 of liability in connection with an arrest. 498 Section 10.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 499 943.11, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 500 943.11âCriminal Justice Standards and Training Commission; 501 membership; meetings; compensation.â 502 (1)(a)âThere is created a Criminal Justice Standards and 503 Training Commission within the Department of Law Enforcement. 504 The Criminal Justice Professionalism Program shall provide staff 505 support to the commission as authorized in s. 943.09; however, 506 the commission must act independently of any criminal justice 507 agency. The commission shall be composed of 19 members, 508 consisting of the Secretary of Corrections or a designated 509 assistant; the Attorney General or a designee; the Director of 510 the Division of the Florida Highway Patrol; and 16 members 511 appointed by the Governor, consisting of 3 sheriffs; 3 chiefs of 512 police; 5 law enforcement officers who are of the rank of 513 sergeant or below within the employing agency; 2 correctional 514 officers, 1 of whom is an administrator of a state correctional 515 institution and 1 of whom is of the rank of sergeant or below 516 within the employing agency; 1 training center director; 1 517 person who is in charge of a county correctional institution; 518 and 1 resident of the state who falls into none of the foregoing 519 classifications. Prior to the appointment, the sheriff, chief of 520 police, law enforcement officer, and correctional officer 521 members must have had at least 4 yearsâ experience as law 522 enforcement officers or correctional officers. 523 Section 11.âPresent subsection (10) of section 943.1395, 524 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (11), and a new 525 subsection (10) is added to that section, to read: 526 943.1395âCertification for employment or appointment; 527 concurrent certification; reemployment or reappointment; 528 inactive status; revocation; suspension; investigation.â 529 (10)âNotwithstanding s. 120.60(5), if an administrative 530 complaint is served on a certified law enforcement officer, a 531 correctional officer, a correctional probation officer, or an 532 instructor, commission staff must provide service by certified 533 mail to the licenseeâs last known address of record and, if 534 possible, by e-mail. If the person providing service does not 535 provide commission staff with proof of service, commission staff 536 must call the last known telephone number of record and cause a 537 short, plain notice to the licensee to be posted on the front 538 page of the commissionâs website. 539 Section 12.âSection 943.1726, Florida Statutes, is amended 540 to read: 541 943.1726âContinued employment training relating to diabetic 542 emergencies.âThe commission department shall establish an online 543 continued employment training component relating to diabetic 544 emergencies. The training component shall include, but need not 545 be limited to, instruction on the recognition of symptoms of 546 such an emergency, distinguishing such an emergency from alcohol 547 intoxication or drug overdose, and appropriate first aid for 548 such an emergency. Completion of the training component may 549 count toward the 40 hours of instruction for continued 550 employment or appointment as a law enforcement officer required 551 under s. 943.135. 552 Section 13.âSection 943.17261, Florida Statutes, is amended 553 to read: 554 943.17261âDepartment of Law Enforcement; Training related 555 to medical use of marijuana.âThe commission Department of Law 556 Enforcement shall develop a 4-hour online initial training 557 course, and a 2-hour online continuing education course, which 558 shall be made available for use by all law enforcement agencies 559 in this state. Such training shall cover the legal parameters of 560 marijuana-related activities governed by ss. 381.986 and 381.988 561 relating to criminal laws governing marijuana. 562 Section 14.âSection 943.1727, Florida Statutes, is amended 563 to read: 564 943.1727âContinued employment training relating to autism 565 spectrum disorder.âThe commission department shall establish a 566 continued employment training component relating to autism 567 spectrum disorder as defined in s. 627.6686. The training 568 component shall include, but need not be limited to, instruction 569 on the recognition of the symptoms and characteristics of an 570 individual on the autism disorder spectrum and appropriate 571 responses to an individual exhibiting such symptoms and 572 characteristics. Completion of the training component may count 573 toward the 40 hours of instruction for continued employment or 574 appointment as a law enforcement officer required under s. 575 943.135. 576 Section 15.âSection 943.17299, Florida Statutes, is amended 577 to read: 578 943.17299âContinued employment training relating to 579 Alzheimerâs disease and related forms of dementia.âThe 580 commission department shall establish an online, continued 581 employment training component relating to Alzheimerâs disease 582 and related forms of dementia. The training component must be 583 developed in consultation with the Department of Elder Affairs 584 and must include, but need not be limited to, instruction on 585 interacting with persons with Alzheimerâs disease or a related 586 form of dementia, including instruction on techniques for 587 recognizing behavioral symptoms and characteristics, effective 588 communication, employing the use of alternatives to physical 589 restraints, and identifying signs of abuse, neglect, or 590 exploitation. Completion of the training component may count 591 toward the 40 hours of instruction for continued employment or 592 appointment as a law enforcement officer, correctional officer, 593 or correctional probation officer required under s. 943.135. 594 Section 16.âExcept as otherwise expressly provided in this 595 act and except for this section, which shall take effect upon 596 this act becoming a law, this act shall take effect July 1, 597 2026.